Louisiana, session 2026, HB123.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:571.36(A)(introductory paragraph), (C)(1)(introductory
paragraph), (2)(introductory paragraph), (3)(introductory paragraph), and (4)(introductory
paragraph), and (D) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 15:571.36(F) and (G) and
571.39 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§571.36. Electronic monitoring equipment
A. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, corrections services,
the office of state police, and the Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and
Administration of Criminal Justice, hereinafter referred to as the "commission", shall
develop written policies and procedures in the manner provided in the
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-336 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 123
Administrative Procedure Act for the promulgation of rules governing mandatory
requirements for electronic monitoring service providers and manufacturers,
including the availability, storage, use of, and operational capacity for electronic
monitoring equipment utilized for pretrial, post-conviction, or monitoring, which
shall include all of the following requirements:
* * *
C.(1) When an individual has been placed under electronic monitoring, the
provider of the electronic monitoring services shall, by noon of the following day,
provide law enforcement agencies within the appropriate jurisdiction and the
prosecuting authority the commission with all of the following information:
* * *
(2) Electronic monitoring service providers shall submit an accurate report
to each court exercising jurisdiction over the persons being monitored and the
prosecuting authority, the commission by the tenth day of each month for the
previous month's monitoring activity to include with all of the following information:
* * *
(3) By January fifteenth of each year, electronic monitoring service providers
shall submit an accurate annual report to each court exercising jurisdiction over any
monitored person during the previous calendar year the commission that includes all
of the following information:
* * *
(4) When a violation of the defendant's monitoring conditions has occurred,
the provider of electronic monitoring services shall report the violation to the bail
agent on record, the law enforcement agencies within the appropriate jurisdiction,
and the prosecuting authority, and the court exercising jurisdiction over the
defendant immediately but in no event not longer than thirty minutes from the
provider's verification of a notice of violation that any of the following involving the
electronic monitoring equipment has occurred:
* * *
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-336 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 123
D. Any provider of an electronic monitoring service who intentionally
withholds or intentionally fails to timely report information as required by this
Section shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars per each day of a violation,
not to exceed ten thousand dollars per instance or individual monitored, or
imprisoned with or without hard labor for not more than six months, and shall be
prohibited from registering to provide electronic monitoring services in this state for
a period of five years one year.
* * *
F. Any person or agency in possession of personal information of the
monitored individual that is obtained pursuant to Subsection C of this Section shall
implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and practices appropriate to
the nature of the information to protect the personal information from unauthorized
access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure.
G. Except as provided in Subsection C of this Section, no employee of a
state agency, law enforcement agency, or prosecuting authority shall intentionally
release, disseminate, or publish any personal information of the monitored
individual. Any person who violates the provisions of this Subsection shall be fined
not more than five thousand dollars, imprisoned with or without hard labor for not
more than one year, or both.
§571.39. Registration of electronic monitoring service providers
A. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Commission" means the Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement
and Administration of Criminal Justice.
(2) "Electronic monitoring service provider" or "provider" means any person
or entity who offers electronic monitoring services for the purpose of monitoring,
tracking, or supervising pretrial or post-conviction persons within this state.
B.(1) The commission shall develop and maintain a central repository
capable of performing all of the following:
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-336 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 123
(a) Registration of every electronic monitoring service provider operating
in this state.
(b) Receipt of monthly and annual reports.
(c) Enforcement and discipline of providers.
(2) The commission shall implement and maintain reasonable security
procedures and practices appropriate to the nature of the information to protect the
personal information of monitored individuals within the central repository from
unauthorized access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure.
C. Any electronic monitoring service provider that operates in this state shall
both register with the commission and certify in writing that the provider meets the
criteria provided in R.S. 15:571.36. The application for registration shall be
submitted on forms provided by the commission and shall contain all of the
information required by such forms and any accompanying instructions.
D. A provider shall, after notice and a hearing conducted in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act, be removed from the registry and prohibited from
registering to provide electronic monitoring services in this state for a period of five
years from the date of removal if the commission determines that a violation of R.S.
15:571.36(D) has occurred.
E. The commission shall promulgate rules in the manner provided in the
Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Section.
Section 2. R.S. 15:571.36(C)(5) and 835 are hereby repealed in their entirety.